Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.240

Town marshal—Police department.

The department of police in a town shall be under the direction and control of the marshal subject to the direction of the mayor. He or she may pursue and arrest violators of town ordinances beyond the town limits.

The marshal's lawful orders shall be promptly executed by deputies, police officers and watchpersons. Every citizen shall lend him or her aid, when required, for the arrest of offenders and maintenance of public order. He or she may appoint, subject to the approval of the mayor, one or more deputies, for whose acts he and his or her bondspersons shall be responsible, whose compensation shall be fixed by the council. With the concurrence of the mayor, the marshal may appoint additional police officers for one day only when necessary for the preservation of public order.

The marshal shall have the same authority as that conferred upon sheriffs for the suppression of any riot, public tumult, disturbance of the peace, or resistance against the laws or public authorities in the lawful exercise of their functions and shall be entitled to the same protection.

The marshal shall execute and return all process issued and directed to him or her by any legal authority and for his or her services shall receive the same fees as are paid to constables. The marshal shall perform such other services as the council by ordinance may require.

[ 2007 c 218 s 67; 1987 c 3 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 316 s 24; 1965 c 125 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.240. Prior: 1963 c 191 s 1; 1890 p 213 s 172; RRS s 9190.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 316: See note following RCW 70.48.020.